Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.260

Temporary orders to cease and desist.

(1) If the director determines that a violation of this chapter or of a rule adopted or an order issued under this chapter by a licensee, authorized delegate, or other person subject to this chapter is likely to cause immediate and irreparable harm to the licensee, its customers, or the public as a result of the violation, or cause insolvency or significant dissipation of the assets of the licensee, the director may issue a temporary order to cease and desist requiring the licensee, authorized delegate, or other person subject to this chapter to cease and desist from conducting business in this state or to cease and desist from the violation or undertake affirmative actions as are necessary to comply with this chapter, any rule adopted under this chapter, or order issued by the director under this chapter. The order is effective upon service upon the licensee, authorized delegate, or other person subject to this chapter.

(2) A temporary order to cease and desist remains effective and enforceable pending the completion of an administrative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW. If, after a hearing, the director finds that by a preponderance of the evidence, all or any part of the order is supported by the facts, the director may make the temporary order to cease and desist permanent under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) A licensee, an authorized delegate, or other person subject to this chapter that is served with a temporary order to cease and desist may petition the superior court for a judicial order setting aside, limiting, or suspending the enforcement, operation, or effectiveness of the order pending the completion of an administrative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2003 c 287 s 28.]